Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.010

Actionable nuisance defined.

The obstruction of any highway or the closing of the channel of any stream used for boating or rafting logs, lumber or timber, or whatever is injurious to health or indecent or offensive to the senses, or an obstruction to the free use of property, so as to essentially interfere with the comfortable enjoyment of the life and property, is a nuisance and the subject of an action for damages and other and further relief.

[Code 1881 s 605; 1877 p 126 s 610; 1869 p 144 s 599; 1854 p 207 s 405; RRS s 943.]

NOTES:

Crimes

malicious mischief: Chapter 9.61 RCW.

public nuisance: RCW 9.66.010.